California statutes. Education Code
 completing a complaint form, which can be obtained on the bureau’s internet website (internet website address).”

(D) “The Office of Student Assistance and Relief is available to support prospective students, current students, or past students of private postsecondary educational institutions in making informed decisions, understanding their rights, and navigating available services and relief options. The office may be reached by calling (toll-free telephone number) or by visiting (internet website address).”

(4) The address or addresses where class sessions will be held.

(5) A description of the programs offered and a description of the instruction provided in each of the courses offered by the institution, the
 requirements for completion of each program, including required courses, any final tests or examinations, any required internships or externships, and the total number of credit hours, clock hours, or other increments required for completion.

(6) If the educational program is designed to lead to positions in a profession, occupation, trade, or career field requiring licensure in this state, a notice to that effect and a list of the requirements for eligibility for licensure.

(7) Information regarding the faculty and their qualifications.

(8) A detailed description of institutional policies in the following areas:

(A) Admissions policies, including the institution’s
 policies regarding the acceptance of credits earned at other institutions or through challenge examinations and achievement tests, and a list describing any transfer or articulation agreements between the institution and any other college or university that provides for the
 transfer of credits earned in the program of instruction. If the institution has not entered into an articulation or transfer agreement with any other college or university, the institution shall disclose that fact.

(B) Cancellation, withdrawal, and refund policies, including an explanation that the student has the right to cancel the enrollment agreement and obtain a refund of charges paid through attendance at the first class session, or the seventh day after enrollment, whichever is later. The text shall also include a description of the procedures that a student is required to follow to cancel the enrollment agreement or withdraw from the institution and obtain a refund consistent with the requirements of Article 13 (commencing with Section 94919).

(C) Probation and dismissal policies.

(D) Attendance policies.

(E) Leave-of-absence policies.

(9) The schedule of total charges for a period of attendance and an estimated schedule of total charges for the entire educational program.

(10) A statement reporting whether the institution participates in federal and state financial aid programs, and if so, all consumer information that is required to be disclosed to the student pursuant to the applicable federal and state financial aid programs.

(11) A statement specifying that, if a student obtains a loan to pay for an educational program, the
 student will have the responsibility to repay the full amount of the loan plus interest, less the amount of any refund, and that, if the student has received federal student financial aid funds, the student is entitled to a refund of the moneys not paid from federal student financial aid program funds.

(12) A statement specifying whether the institution has a pending petition in bankruptcy, is operating as a debtor in possession, has filed a petition within the preceding five years, or has had a petition in bankruptcy filed against it within the preceding five years that resulted in reorganization under Chapter 11 of the United States Bankruptcy Code (11 U.S.C. Sec. 1101 et seq.).

(13) If the institution provides placement services, a description of the nature and extent of the
 placement services.

(14) A description of the student’s rights and responsibilities with respect to the Student Tuition Recovery Fund. This statement shall specify that it is a state requirement that a student who pays the student’s tuition is required to pay a state-imposed assessment for the Student Tuition Recovery Fund. This statement shall also describe the purpose and operation of the Student Tuition Recovery Fund and the requirements for filing a claim against the Student Tuition Recovery Fund.

(15) The following statement:

 “NOTICE CONCERNING TRANSFERABILITY OF CREDITS AND CREDENTIALS EARNED AT OUR INSTITUTIONThe transferability of credits you earn at (name of institution) is at the complete discretion of an institution to which you may seek to transfer. Acceptance of the (degree, diploma, or certificate) you earn in (name of educational program) is also at the complete discretion of the institution to which you may seek to transfer. If the (credits or degree, diploma, or
 certificate) that you earn at this institution are not accepted at the institution to which you seek to transfer, you may be required to repeat some or all of your coursework at that institution. For this reason you should make certain that your attendance at this institution will meet your educational goals. This may include contacting an institution to which you may seek to transfer after attending (name of institution) to determine if your (credits or degree, diploma, or certificate) will transfer.”

 

(16) A statement specifying whether the institution, or any of its degree programs, are accredited by an accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of Education. If the institution is unaccredited and offers an associate, baccalaureate, master’s,
 or doctoral degree, or is accredited and offers an unaccredited program for an associate, baccalaureate, master’s, or
 doctoral degree, the statement shall disclose the known limitations of the degree program, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Whether a graduate of the degree program will be eligible to sit for the applicable licensure exam in California and other states or become certified or registered as required for the applicable profession, occupation, trade, or career field in California.

(B) A degree program that is unaccredited or a degree from an unaccredited institution is not recognized for some employment positions, including, but not limited to, positions with the State of California.

(C) That a student enrolled in an unaccredited institution is not eligible for federal
 financial aid programs.

(b) If the institution has a general student brochure, the institution shall provide that brochure to the prospective student before enrollment. In addition, if the institution has a program-specific student brochure for the program in which the prospective student seeks to enroll, the institution shall provide the program-specific student brochure to the prospective student before enrollment.

(c) An institution shall provide the school catalog to any person upon request. In addition, if the institution has student brochures, the institution shall disclose the requested brochures to any interested person upon request.

(d) An accredited institution is not required to provide a School Performance
 Fact Sheet to a prospective student who is not a California resident, not residing in California at the time of the student’s enrollment, and enrolling in an accredited distance learning degree program offered by the institution, if the institution complies with all federal laws, the applicable laws of the state where the student is located, and other appropriate laws, including, but not limited to, consumer protection and student disclosure requirements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 592, Sec. 43.   (SB 861)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94910.

Except as provided in subdivision (d) of Section 94909 and Section 94910.5, prior to enrollment, an institution shall provide a prospective student with a current School Performance Fact Sheet containing, at a minimum, the following information, as it relates to the educational program:

(a) Completion rates, as calculated pursuant to Article 16 (commencing with Section 94928).

(b) Placement rates for each educational program, as calculated pursuant to Article 16 (commencing with Section 94928), if the educational program is designed to lead to, or the institution makes any express or implied claim related to preparing students for, a recognized
 career, occupation, vocation, job, or job title.

(c) License examination passage rates for programs leading to employment for which passage of a state licensing examination is required, as calculated pursuant to Article 16 (commencing with Section 94928).

(d) Salary or wage information, as calculated pursuant to Article 16 (commencing with Section 94928).

(e) If a program is too new to provide data for any of the categories listed in this subdivision, the institution shall state on its fact sheet: “This program is new. Therefore, the number of students who graduate, the number of students who are placed, or the starting salary you can earn after finishing the educational program are unknown at this time. Information
 regarding general salary and placement statistics may be available from government sources or from the institution, but is not equivalent to actual performance data.”

(f) All of the following:

(1) A description of the manner in which the figures described in subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, are calculated or a statement informing the reader of where they may obtain a description of the manner in which the figures described in subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, are calculated.

(2) A statement informing the reader of where they may obtain from the institution a list of the employment positions determined to be within the field for which a student received education and training for the calculation of job placement rates
 as required by subdivision (b).

(3) A statement informing the reader of where they may obtain from the institution a list of the objective sources of information used to substantiate the salary disclosure as required by subdivision (d).

(g) The following statements:

(1) “This fact sheet is filed with the Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education. Regardless of any information you may have relating to completion rates, placement rates, starting salaries, or license exam passage rates, this fact sheet contains the information as calculated pursuant to state law.”

(2) “Any questions a student may have regarding this fact sheet that have not been
 satisfactorily answered by the institution may be directed to the Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education at (address), Sacramento, CA (ZIP Code), (internet website), (telephone and fax numbers).”

(h) If the institution participates in federal financial aid programs, the most recent three-year cohort default rate reported by the United States Department of Education for the institution and the percentage of enrolled students receiving federal student loans.

(i) Data and information disclosed pursuant to subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, is not required to include students who satisfy the qualifications specified in subdivision (d) of Section 94909, but an institution shall disclose whether the data, information, or both provided in its fact sheet excludes students
 pursuant to this subdivision. An institution shall not actively use data specific to the fact sheet in its recruitment materials or other recruitment efforts of students who are not California residents and do not reside in California at the time of their enrollment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 592, Sec. 44.   (SB 861)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94910.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a law school that meets the criteria of subdivision (b) shall be deemed to satisfy the requirements of this chapter regarding a School Performance Fact Sheet by doing all of the following:

(1) Complying with Standard 509 of the American Bar Association’s Standards and Rules of Procedure for Approval of Law Schools, as that standard may be amended.

(2) Providing completion rates of students and placement rates, bar passage rates, and salary and wage information of graduates to prospective students prior to enrollment through the law school application process administered by the Law School Admission Council.

(3) (A) Providing to prospective students any additional information required to be reported on a School Performance Fact Sheet that is not reported pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2), including, but not limited to, the most recent three-year cohort default rate reported by the United States Department of Education for the law school and the percentage of enrolled students receiving federal student loans.

(B) If the law school’s three-year cohort default rate reported by the United States Department of Education is aggregated with the three-year cohort default rate of an institution to which the law school belongs, then the law school shall provide to prospective students the law school’s three-year cohort default rate disaggregated from the institution’s three-year cohort default rate.

(C) The law school shall, at a minimum, provide the
 information described in this paragraph to prospective students by clearly posting the information in a conspicuous location on the law school’s internet website.

(4) Annually providing the information required to be disclosed pursuant to this subdivision to the bureau.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall apply to a law school that meets all of the following criteria:

(1) The law school is accredited by the Council of the Section of Legal Education and Admissions to the Bar of the American Bar Association.

(2) The law school is owned by an institution authorized to operate by the bureau.

(3) The law school reports graduate salary information and other information to the National Association for Law
 Placement.

(4) The law school is approved to operate by the bureau pursuant to Section 94874.8.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 99.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94911.

An enrollment agreement shall include, at a minimum, all of the following:

(a) The name of the institution and the name of the educational program, including the total number of credit hours, clock hours, or other increment required to complete the educational program.

(b) A schedule of total charges, including a list of any charges that are nonrefundable and the student’s obligations to the Student Tuition Recovery Fund, clearly identified as nonrefundable charges.

(c) In underlined capital letters on the same page of the enrollment agreement in which the student’s signature is required, “THE TOTAL CHARGES FOR THE CURRENT PERIOD OF ATTENDANCE,” “THE ESTIMATED
 TOTAL CHARGES FOR THE ENTIRE EDUCATIONAL PROGRAM,” and “THE TOTAL CHARGES THE STUDENT IS OBLIGATED TO PAY UPON ENROLLMENT,” followed by the relevant amounts of charges in bold, underlined type.

(d) A clear and conspicuous statement that the enrollment agreement is legally binding when signed by the student and accepted by the institution.

(e) (1) A disclosure with a clear and conspicuous caption, “STUDENT’S RIGHT TO CANCEL,” under which it is explained that the student has the right to cancel the enrollment agreement and obtain a refund of charges paid through attendance at the first class session, or the seventh day after enrollment, whichever is later.

(2) The disclosure shall contain the institution’s refund policy and a statement that, if the student has received federal student financial
 aid funds, the student is entitled to a refund of moneys not paid from federal student financial aid program funds.

(3) The text shall also include a description of the procedures that a student is required to follow to cancel the enrollment agreement or withdraw from the institution and obtain a refund.

(f) A statement specifying that, if the student obtains a loan to pay for an educational program, the student will have the responsibility to repay the full amount of the loan plus interest, less the amount of any refund.

(g) A statement specifying that, if the student is eligible for a loan guaranteed by the federal or state government and the student defaults on the loan, both of the following may occur:

(1) The federal or state government or a loan
 guarantee agency may take action against the student, including applying any income tax refund to which the person is entitled to reduce the balance owed on the loan.

(2) The student may not be eligible for any other federal student financial aid at another institution or other government assistance until the loan is repaid.

(h) The transferability disclosure that is required to be included in the school catalog, as specified in paragraph (15) of subdivision (a) of Section 94909.

(i) (1) The following statement: “Prior to signing this enrollment agreement, you must be given a catalog or brochure and a School Performance Fact Sheet, which you are encouraged to review prior to signing this agreement. These documents contain important policies and performance data for this institution. This
 institution is required to have you sign and date the information included in the School Performance Fact Sheet relating to completion rates, placement rates, license examination passage rates, salaries or wages, and the most recent three-year cohort default rate, if applicable, prior to signing this agreement.”

(2) Immediately following the statement required by paragraph (1), a line for the student to initial, including the following statement: “I certify that I have received the catalog, School Performance Fact Sheet, and information regarding completion rates, placement rates, license examination passage rates, salary or wage information, and the most recent three-year cohort default rate, if applicable, included in the School Performance Fact Sheet, and have signed, initialed, and dated the information provided in the School Performance Fact Sheet.”

(j) The following
 statements:

 (1) “Any questions a student may have regarding this enrollment agreement that have not been satisfactorily answered by the institution may be directed to the Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education at (address), Sacramento, CA (ZIP Code), (internet website address), (telephone and fax numbers).”

 

(2) “A student or any member of the public may file a complaint about this institution with the Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education by calling (toll-free telephone number) or by completing a complaint form, which can be obtained on the bureau’s internet website (internet website address).”

 

(k) The following statement above the space for the student’s signature:

 “I understand that this is a legally binding contract. My signature below certifies that I have read, understood, and agreed to my rights and responsibilities, and that the institution’s cancellation and refund policies have been clearly explained to me.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 100.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94912.

Prior to the execution of an enrollment agreement, the information required to be disclosed pursuant to subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, of Section 94910 shall be signed and dated by the institution and the student. Each of these items shall also be initialed and dated by the student.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94912.5.

(a) By January 1, 2020, and permanently thereafter, each institution subject to this chapter that participates in federal student financial aid programs, including, but not necessarily limited to, those programs authorized by Title IV of the federal Higher Education Act of 1965 or veterans’ financial aid programs authorized pursuant to Section 21.4253 of Title 38 of the Code of Federal Regulations, shall provide students with the Financial Aid Shopping Sheet as developed by the United States Department of Education to inform students or potential students about financial aid award packages prior to enrollment.

(b) In implementing this section, an institution that is subject to this chapter that participates in federal student financial aid
 programs, including, but not necessarily limited to, those programs authorized by Title IV of the federal Higher Education Act of 1965 or veterans’ financial aid programs authorized pursuant to Section 21.4253 of Title 38 of the Code of Federal Regulations, may seek guidance as needed from the United States Department of Education.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 671, Sec. 3.   (AB 1858)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94913.

(a) An institution that maintains an internet website shall provide on that internet website the current version of all of the following:

(1) The school catalog.

(2) A School Performance Fact Sheet for each educational program offered by the institution.

(3) Student brochures offered by the institution.

(4) A link to the bureau’s internet website.

(5) The institution’s most recent annual report submitted to the bureau.

(b) An institution shall include information concerning where students may access the bureau’s internet website anywhere the institution identifies itself as being approved by the bureau.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 497, Sec. 88.   (SB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. Consumer Loans to Students [94916. - 94918.5.]

94916.

An institution extending credit or lending money to an individual for institutional and noninstitutional charges for an educational program shall cause any note, instrument, or other evidence of indebtedness taken in connection with that extension of credit or loan to be conspicuously marked on its face in at least 12-point type with the following notice:

 “NOTICE”

 “You may assert against the holder of the promissory note you signed in order to finance the cost of the educational program all of the claims and defenses that you could assert against this institution, up to the amount you have already paid under the promissory note.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 840, Sec. 27.   (SB 1247)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94917.

A note, instrument, or other evidence of indebtedness relating to payment for an educational program is void and not enforceable unless, at the time of execution of the note, instrument, or other evidence of indebtedness, the institution held an approval to operate or valid out-of-state registration with the bureau.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 544, Sec. 11.   (SB 1433)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94918.

In making consumer loans to students, an institution shall also comply with the requirements of the Federal Truth in Lending Act pursuant to Title 15 of the United States Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94918.5.

(a) The bureau’s administration of this article or Article 13 (commencing with Section 94919) shall not preclude the authority of the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation over, and application of the California Consumer Financial Protection Law to, any “covered persons” as defined by subdivision (f) of Section 90005 of the Financial Code, including, but not limited to, private postsecondary educational institutions.

(b) Nothing in this chapter shall constitute regulation of an institution’s financial product or service pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 90009 of the Financial Code, or shall otherwise
 be construed to limit the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation’s jurisdiction
 with respect to an institution’s financial product or service.

(c) An institution subject to this chapter shall not be considered “acting under the authority” of its status with the bureau pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 90002 of the Financial Code when offering financial products or services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 544, Sec. 12.   (SB 1433)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 13. Cancellations, Withdrawals, and Refunds [94919. - 94922.]

94919.

(a) An institution that participates in the federal student financial aid programs complies with this article by complying with applicable regulations of the federal student financial aid programs under Title IV of the federal Higher Education Act of 1965.

(b) The institution shall advise each student that a notice of cancellation shall be in writing, and that a withdrawal may be effectuated by the student’s written notice or by the student’s conduct, including, but not necessarily limited to, a student’s lack of attendance.

(c) The institution shall also provide a pro rata refund of nonfederal student financial aid program moneys paid
 for institutional charges to students who have completed 60 percent or less of the period of attendance.

(d) Institutions shall refund 100 percent of the amount paid for institutional charges, less a reasonable deposit or application fee not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250), if notice of cancellation is made through attendance at the first class session, or the seventh day after enrollment, whichever is later.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94920.

An institution that does not participate in the federal student financial aid programs shall do all of the following:

(a) The institution shall advise each student that a notice of cancellation shall be in writing, and that a withdrawal may be effectuated by the student’s written notice or by the student’s conduct, including, but not necessarily limited to, a student’s lack of attendance.

(b) Institutions shall refund 100 percent of the amount paid for institutional charges, less a reasonable deposit or application fee not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250), if notice of cancellation is made through attendance at the first class session, or the seventh
 day after enrollment, whichever is later.

(c) The bureau may adopt by regulation a different method of calculation for instruction delivered by other means, including, but not necessarily limited to, distance education.

(d) The institution shall have a refund policy for the return of unearned institutional charges if the student cancels an enrollment agreement or withdraws during a period of attendance. The refund policy for students who have completed 60 percent or less of the period of attendance shall be a pro rata refund.

(e) The institution shall pay or credit refunds within 45 days of a student’s cancellation or withdrawal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 167, Sec. 2.   (AB 1013)   Effective January 1, 2012.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94921.

An institution offering an educational program for which the refund calculations set forth in this article cannot be utilized because of the unique way in which the educational program is structured, may petition the bureau for an alternative method of calculating tuition refunds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94922.

A student may not waive any provision of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 14. Student Tuition Recovery Fund [94923. - 94925.]

94923.

(a) The Student Tuition Recovery Fund relieves or mitigates economic loss suffered by a student while enrolled in an institution not exempt from this article pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 94874), who, at the time of the student’s enrollment, was a California resident or was enrolled in a California residency program, prepaid tuition, and suffered economic loss.

(b) (1) The bureau shall adopt, by regulation, procedures governing the administration and maintenance of the Student Tuition Recovery Fund. The fund shall be used to provide awards to students who suffer economic loss.

(2) The following students, and any other students deemed appropriate, are eligible
 for payment from the Student Tuition Recovery Fund:

(A) Any student who was enrolled at an institution, at a location of the institution, or in an educational program offered by the institution, at the time that institution, location, or program was closed or discontinued, as applicable, who did not choose to participate in a teach-out plan approved by the bureau or did not complete a chosen teach-out plan approved by the bureau.

(B) Any student who was enrolled at an institution or a location of the institution within the 120-day period before the closure of the institution or location of the institution, or who was enrolled in an educational program within the 120-day period before the program was discontinued.

(C) Any student who was enrolled at an institution or a location of the institution more than 120 days
 before the closure of the institution or location of the institution, in an educational program offered by the institution as to which the bureau determines there was a significant decline in the quality or value of the program more than 120 days before closure.

(D) A student to whom an institution has been ordered to pay a refund by the bureau but has failed to do so.

(E) A student to whom an institution has failed to pay or reimburse loan proceeds under a federal student loan program as required by law, or has failed to pay or reimburse proceeds received by the institution in excess of tuition and other costs.

(F) A student who has been awarded restitution, a refund, or other monetary award by an arbitrator or court, based on a violation of this chapter by an institution or representative of an institution, but who
 has been unable to collect the award from the institution. The bureau shall review the award or judgment and shall ensure the amount to be paid from the fund does not exceed the student’s economic loss.

(G) Notwithstanding the definition of economic loss in subdivision (f), for purposes of recovery from the Student Tuition Recovery Fund, a student who has sought legal counsel that resulted in the cancellation of one or more student loans in connection with the student’s Student Tuition Recovery Fund claim may seek reimbursement for legal services rendered in an amount up to five hundred dollars ($500). The bureau shall review the invoice of the legal services rendered and evidence of the cancellation of the student loan or loans, and upon verifying that cancellation, pay the claim directly to the student.

(3) Notwithstanding the requirement that a student attend an institution
 that is not exempt from this article as provided in subdivision (a), the following students who either were enrolled at a California campus of a Corinthian Colleges, Inc., institution or who were California students enrolled in an online program offered by an out-of-state campus of a Corinthian Colleges, Inc., institution are eligible for payment from the Student Tuition Recovery Fund:

(A) A student who meets one of the eligibility requirements in paragraph (2), if the student also was residing in California and was attending a campus of a Corinthian Colleges, Inc., institution on or after January 1, 2010.

(B) A student who was enrolled as of June 20, 2014, or withdrew within 120 days of that date, and did not complete the student’s program at the institution.

(c) Any student who is required to pay a Student Tuition
 Recovery Fund assessment who pays tuition equal to or greater than the required assessment shall be deemed to have paid the required assessment, whether or not the student’s enrollment agreement specifies collection of the required assessment, and whether or not the institution identifies any money collected from the student as a Student Tuition Recovery Fund assessment.

(d) A student who suffers educational opportunity losses, whose charges are paid by a third-party payer, is eligible for educational credits under the fund.

(e) The bureau may seek repayment to the Student Tuition Recovery Fund from an institution found in violation of the law for which a student claim was paid. An institution shall not be eligible to renew its approval to operate with the bureau if the repayment is not made to the bureau as requested.

(f) (1) For purposes of this section, “economic loss” includes, but is not limited to, any of the following:

(A) All cash or other consideration paid by the student to the institution.

(B) All expenses related to private or government student loans, including retail installment contracts made by the institution, paid to the student or to the institution in connection with the student’s attendance at the institution, including related principal, interest, and any fees.

(C) All third-party payments, including government grants, paid to the student or to the institution in connection with the student’s attendance at the institution.

(2) Economic loss does not include Student Tuition Recovery Fund assessments, unless the student is entitled to a full refund under Section 94919 or 94920, or nonpecuniary damages such as inconvenience, aggravation, emotional distress, or punitive damages. Economic loss does not include legal fees, attorney fees, court costs, or arbitration fees. This subdivision shall not prevent the bureau from further defining economic loss to include loss of educational opportunity.

(g) As a condition of the bureau satisfying a student loan obligation on behalf of a Student Tuition Recovery Fund applicant, the loan servicer or debtholder shall submit a letter stating that the servicer or holder will no longer collect on the debt and shall report the debt as “paid in full” to all credit reporting agencies. The bureau shall retain a copy of that letter and provide the original to the applicant.

(h) Except as provided in subdivision (i), the bureau shall require a student seeking reimbursement from the Student Tuition Recovery Fund to file a written application that shall be received by the bureau no later than four years after the date of the action that made the student eligible for recovery from the Student Tuition Recovery Fund.

(i) Any student whose loan is revived by a loanholder or debt collector after a period of noncollection by the holder or collector may, at any time, file a written application for recovery from the Student Tuition Recovery Fund for the debt that would have been otherwise eligible for recovery under this section.

(j) The bureau may use the moneys in the Student Tuition Recovery Fund to cover the costs of both of the following:

(1) Student Tuition Recovery Fund claim administration.

(2) Positions of the Office of Student Assistance and Relief.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 9, Sec. 14.   (AB 123)   Effective June 27, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94924.

(a) The bureau shall determine the amount of Student Tuition Recovery Fund assessments to be collected for each student.

(b) All assessments collected pursuant to this article shall be credited to the Student Tuition Recovery Fund, along with any accrued interest, for the purpose of this article. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the moneys in the Student Tuition Recovery Fund are continuously appropriated to the bureau, without regard to fiscal year, for the purposes of this article.

(c) Except when an institution provides a full refund pursuant to Section 94919 or Section 94920, the Student Tuition Recovery Fund assessment is
 nonrefundable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 840, Sec. 29.   (SB 1247)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94925.

(a) The amount in the Student Tuition Recovery Fund shall not exceed twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) at any time.

(b) If the bureau has temporarily stopped collecting the Student Tuition Recovery Fund assessments because the fund has approached the twenty-five-million dollar ($25,000,000) limit in subdivision (a), the bureau shall resume collecting Student Tuition Recovery Fund assessments when the fund falls below twenty million dollars ($20,000,000).

(c) An otherwise eligible student who enrolled during a period when institutions were not required to collect Student Tuition Recovery Fund assessments is eligible for Student Tuition Recovery Fund payments despite not having paid any Student
 Tuition Recovery Fund assessment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 80.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 15. Orderly Institutional Closure and Teach-outs [94926. - 94927.5.]

94926.

At least 30 days prior to closing, the institution shall notify the bureau in writing of its intention to close. The notice shall be accompanied by a closure plan, which shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, all of the following:

(a) A plan for providing teach-outs of educational programs, including any agreements with any other postsecondary educational institutions to provide teach-outs.

(b) If no teach-out plan is contemplated, or for students who do not wish to participate in a teach-out, arrangements for making refunds within 45 days from the date of closure, or for institutions that participate in federal student financial aid programs
 arrangements for making refunds and returning federal student financial aid program funds.

(c) If the institution is a participant in federal student financial aid programs, it shall provide students information concerning these programs and institutional closures.

(d) A plan for the disposition of student records.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94926.5.

(a) An institution’s approval to operate is automatically terminated on the date of closure or when its exemption from this chapter has been verified by the bureau.

(b) An institution that does not identify a date of closure shall have one selected by the bureau.

(c) A terminated license shall not be reinstated.
